asdf/dicionarios/pt_pt.aff
SFX 32 Y 77
SFX 32   0               -lhe            .               +DP=3,DN=s
SFX 32   0               -lho            .               +DP=3,DN=s,AP=3,AN=s,AG=m
SFX 32   0               -lha            .               +DP=3,DN=s,AP=3,AN=s,AG=f
SFX 32   0               -lhes           .               +DP=3,DN=p
SFX 32   0               -lhos           .               +DP=3,DN=s,AP=3,AN=p,AG=m
SFX 32   0               -lhas           .               +DP=3,DN=s,AP=3,AN=p,AG=f
SFX 32   0               -lhe-ei         r               +DP=3,DN=s,P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -lhe-eis        r               +DP=3,DN=s,P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -lhe-emos       r               +DP=3,DN=s,P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -lhe-á          r               +DP=3,DN=s,P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -lhe-ás         r               +DP=3,DN=s,P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -lhe-ão         r               +DP=3,DN=s,P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -lhe-iam        r               +DP=3,DN=s,P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -lhe-íamos      r               +DP=3,DN=s,P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -lhe-ia         r               +DP=3,DN=s,P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX 32   0               -lhe-ias        r               +DP=3,DN=s,P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX 32   0               -lhes-ei        r               +DP=3,DN=p,P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -lhes-eis       r               +DP=3,DN=p,P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -lhes-emos      r               +DP=3,DN=p,P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -lhes-á         r               +DP=3,DN=p,P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -lhes-ás        r               +DP=3,DN=p,P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -lhes-ão        r               +DP=3,DN=p,P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -lhes-iam       r               +DP=3,DN=p,P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -lhes-íamos     r               +DP=3,DN=p,P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -lhes-ia        r               +DP=3,DN=p,P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX 32   0               -lhes-ias       r               +DP=3,DN=p,P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX 32   0               -me             .               +AP=1,AN=s
SFX 32   0               -te             .               +AP=2,AN=s
SFX 32   0               -se             .               +AP=3,AN=_
SFX 32   ns              m-nos           ns              +AP=1,AN=p
SFX 32   s               -nos            mos             +AP=1,AN=p
SFX 32   0               -nos            [^náo]s         +AP=1,AN=p
SFX 32   0               -nos            [^sá]           +AP=1,AN=p
SFX 32   0               -vos            .               +AP=2,AN=p
SFX 32   0               -me-ei          r               +AP=1,AN=s,P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -me-eis         r               +AP=1,AN=s,P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -me-emos        r               +AP=1,AN=s,P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -me-á           r               +AP=1,AN=s,P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -me-ás          r               +AP=1,AN=s,P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -me-ão          r               +AP=1,AN=s,P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -me-iam         r               +AP=1,AN=s,P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -me-íamos       r               +AP=1,AN=s,P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -me-ia          r               +AP=1,AN=s,P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX 32   0               -me-ias         r               +AP=1,AN=s,P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX 32   0               -te-ei          r               +AP=2,AN=s,P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -te-emos        r               +AP=2,AN=s,P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -te-á           r               +AP=2,AN=s,P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -te-ás          r               +AP=2,AN=s,P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -te-ão          r               +AP=2,AN=s,P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -te-ias         r               +AP=2,AN=s,P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX 32   0               -te-iam         r               +AP=2,AN=s,P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -te-íamos       r               +AP=2,AN=s,P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -te-ia          r               +AP=2,AN=s,P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX 32   0               -nos-emos       r               +AP=1,AN=p,P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -nos-eis        r               +AP=1,AN=p,P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -nos-á          r               +AP=1,AN=p,P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -nos-ás         r               +AP=1,AN=p,P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -nos-ão         r               +AP=1,AN=p,P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -nos-íamos      r               +AP=1,AN=p,P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -nos-iam        r               +AP=1,AN=p,P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -nos-ia         r               +AP=1,AN=p,P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX 32   0               -nos-ias        r               +AP=1,AN=p,P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX 32   0               -se-ia          r               +AP=3,AN=s,P=3,N=s,T=c
SFX 32   0               -se-ão          r               +AP=3,AN=p,P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -se-iam         r               +AP=3,AN=p,P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -se-á           r               +AP=3,AN=s,P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -vos-eis        r               +AP=2,AN=p,P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -vos-emos       r               +AP=2,AN=p,P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -vos-á          r               +AP=2,AN=p,P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -vos-ei         r               +AP=2,AN=p,P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -vos-ás         r               +AP=2,AN=p,P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX 32   0               -vos-ão         r               +AP=2,AN=p,P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX 32   0               -vos-íeis       r               +AP=2,AN=p,P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -vos-íamos      r               +AP=2,AN=p,P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -vos-iam        r               +AP=2,AN=p,P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX 32   0               -vos-ia         r               +AP=2,AN=p,P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX 32   0               -vos-ias        r               +AP=2,AN=p,P=2,N=s,T=c

SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33   0     's         .

SFX 34 Y 4
SFX 34   r               mento           [ai]r           +CAT=nc,G=m,N=s,FSEM=mento
SFX 34   er              imento          er              +CAT=nc,G=m,N=s,FSEM=mento
SFX 34   r               mentos          [ai]r           +CAT=nc,G=m,N=p,FSEM=mento
SFX 34   er              imentos         er              +CAT=nc,G=m,N=p,FSEM=mento

SFX 35 Y 3
SFX 35   e     ion        e
SFX 35   y     ication    y
SFX 35   0     en         [^ey]

SFX 36 Y 8
SFX 36   r               díssimo         [ia]r           +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX 36   r               díssima         [ia]r           +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX 36   r               díssimas        [ia]r           +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX 36   r               díssimos        [ia]r           +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=m,N=p
SFX 36   er              idíssimo        er              +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX 36   er              idíssima        er              +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX 36   er              idíssimas       er              +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX 36   er              idíssimos       er              +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=m,N=p

SFX 37 Y 3
SFX 37   y     iness      [^aeiou]y
SFX 37   0     ness       [aeiou]y
SFX 37   0     ness       [^y]
